Massachusetts, session 194th, S3248.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
Commissioner of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance may release the city of Lowell of 
a certain Covenant found within a Release Deed from the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, 
acting by and though the Division Capital Asset Management and Maintenance, on behalf of the 
University of Massachusetts at Lowell, to the city of Lowell recorded in the Middlesex North 
Registry of Deeds at Book 32681, Page 142. Said Covenant states “The Premises shall be used 
solely for municipal purposes” and may be released by recording a Release Agreement in said 
Registry. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.